Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1302
Educational technology; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the utilization of appropriate technologies can provide enhanced educational services and broadened educational opportunities for Nebraska learners. It is the intent of the Legislature: (1) To utilize technology to provide effective and efficient digital learning; (2) to provide assistance and direction in the training of Nebraska teachers in uses of technology for instruction through electronic means; (3) to establish and support an electronic data network and databases for Nebraska educators and learners; (4) to support the evaluation and dissemination of models of successful technologies which improve instruction or learning; (5) to provide support for cooperative education-technology ventures in partnership with public or private entities; and (6) to provide support for cooperative purchase or leasing of administrative or instructional software or software licenses in partnership with schools, educational service units, and other states.

Laws 1988, LB 1117, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,140.09;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 958;

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 51.